Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 18. Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995.
§ 33.2-1820.
Posting of conceptual proposals; public comment; public access to procurement records.

Conceptual proposals submitted in accordance with subsection A or B of §

33.2-1803

to a responsible public entity shall be posted by the responsible public entity within 10 working days after acceptance of such proposals as follows:

For responsible public entities that are state agencies, authorities, departments, institutions, and other units of state government, posting shall be on the Department of General Services’ central electronic procurement website. For proposals submitted pursuant to subsection A of §

33.2-1803

, the notice posted shall (i) provide for a period of 120 days for the submission of competing proposals; (ii) include specific information regarding the proposed nature, timing, and scope of the qualifying transportation facility; and (iii) outline the opportunities that will be provided for public comment during the review process; and

For responsible public entities that are local public bodies, posting shall be on the responsible public entity’s website or on the Department of General Services’ central electronic procurement website. In addition, such public bodies may publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the contract is to be performed a summary of the proposals and the location where copies of the proposals are available for public inspection. Such local public bodies are encouraged to utilize the Department of General Services’ central electronic procurement website to provide the public with centralized visibility and access to the Commonwealth’s procurement opportunities.In addition to the posting requirements, at least one copy of the proposals shall be made available for public inspection. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the posting of the conceptual proposals by additional means deemed appropriate by the responsible public entity so as to provide maximum notice to the public of the opportunity to inspect the proposals. Trade secrets, financial records, or other records of the private entity excluded from disclosure under the provisions of subdivision 11 of §

2.2-3705.6

shall not be required to be posted, except as otherwise agreed to by the responsible public entity and the private entity.

In addition to the posting requirements of subsection A, the following shall apply:

For 30 days prior to entering into an interim agreement, a responsible public entity shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the proposals. The public comment period required by this subsection may include a public hearing at the sole discretion of the responsible public entity. After the end of the public comment period, no additional posting shall be required.

For 30 days prior to the planned issuance of a final request for proposals, a responsible public entity shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the draft comprehensive agreement. The public comment period may include a public hearing at the sole discretion of the responsible public entity.

Once the negotiation phase for the development of an interim or a comprehensive agreement is complete and a decision to award has been made by a responsible public entity, the responsible public entity shall (i) post the major business points of the interim or comprehensive agreement, including the projected use of any public funds, on the Department of General Services’ central electronic procurement website; (ii) outline how the public can submit comments on those major business points; and (iii) present the major business points of the interim or comprehensive agreement, including the use of any public funds, to its oversight board at a regularly scheduled meeting of the board that is open to the public.

Once an interim agreement or a comprehensive agreement has been entered into, a responsible public entity shall make procurement records available for public inspection, in accordance with the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.). For the purposes of this subsection, procurement records shall not be interpreted to include (i) trade secrets of the private entity as defined in the Uniform Trade Secrets Act (§ 59.1-336 et seq.) or (ii) financial records, including balance sheets or financial statements of the private entity that are not generally available to the public through regulatory disclosure or otherwise.

Cost estimates relating to a proposed procurement transaction prepared by or for a responsible public entity shall not be open to public inspection.

Any inspection of procurement transaction records under this section shall be subject to reasonable restrictions to ensure the security and integrity of the records.

The provisions of this section shall apply to accepted proposals regardless of whether the process of bargaining will result in an interim or a comprehensive agreement.

History.

2006, c. 936, § 56-573.1:1; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1; 2007, c. 374; 2011, c. 332; 2013, cc. 560, 622; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 612.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 612, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Transportation, by September 1, 2015, shall develop a risk assessment model to identify the relative risks associated with a proposed transportation project and facilitate the identification of high-risk projects in advance of project procurement. Further, the Department of Transportation shall establish procurement processes and guidelines for identified high-risk projects to ensure the protection of the public interest.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 612 inserted “the following shall apply” at the end of subsection B; added the subdivision B 1 designation, deleted “or comprehensive” following “into an interim” and; substituted “at” for “in” following “hearing” in subdivision B 1; and added subdivision B 2.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Responsible public entity. —

The Virginia Port Authority, pursuant to § 56-557, is the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (PPTA) for any concession of Port facilities because the General Assembly has conferred on it alone the power to develop and/or operate Port facilities and, as a result, the Virginia Port Authority bears statutory responsibility to review and evaluate the proposals received by private entities for the concession of Port facilities, and to do so according to any guidelines adopted by it pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012) (decided under prior law).

§ 33.2-1821.
Jurisdiction.

The Commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction to adjudicate all matters specifically committed to its jurisdiction by this chapter.

History.

1995, c. 647, § 56-573.2; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1822.
Contributions and gifts; prohibition during approval process.

No private entity that has submitted a bid or proposal to a public entity that is an executive branch agency directly responsible to the Governor and is seeking to develop or operate a transportation facility pursuant to this chapter, and no individual who is an officer or director of such private entity, shall knowingly provide a contribution, gift, or other item with a value greater than $50 or make an express or implied promise to make such a contribution or gift to the Governor, his political action committee, or the Governor’s Secretaries, if the Secretary is responsible to the Governor for an executive branch agency with jurisdiction over the matters at issue, following the submission of a proposal under this chapter until the execution of a comprehensive agreement thereunder. The provisions of this section shall apply only for any proposal or an interim or comprehensive agreement where the stated or expected value of the contract is $5 million or more.

Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of $500 or up to two times the amount of the contribution or gift, whichever is greater. The attorney for the Commonwealth shall initiate civil proceedings to enforce the civil penalties. Any civil penalties collected shall be payable to the State Treasurer for deposit to the general fund.

History.

2010, c. 732, § 56-573.3; 2011, c. 624; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1823.
Preservation of the Virginia Highway Corporation Act of 1988.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to repeal or change in any manner the Virginia Highway Corporation Act of 1988 (§ 56-535 et seq.), as amended. Nothing in the Virginia Highway Corporation Act of 1988, as amended, shall apply to qualifying transportation facilities undertaken pursuant to the authority of this chapter.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-574; 1995, c. 647; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1824.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

33.2-1824

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1994, c. 855, § 56-575; 2014, c. 805.